Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
MANDATORY COVERAGE

[§393-11] Coverage of regular employees by
group prepaid health care plan. Every employer who pays to a regular
employee monthly wages in an amount of at least 86.67 times the minimum hourly
wage, specified in chapter 387, as rounded off by regulation of the director,
shall provide coverage of such employee by a prepaid group health care plan
qualifying under section 393-7 with a prepaid health care plan contractor in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter. [L 1974, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next